lt-LT: Produkto formatas: Skaitmeninis parsisiuntimas; Fizinis daiktas; Kita
es: Formato del producto: Descarga digital; Artículo físico; Otros
tr: Ürün formatı: Dijital indirme; Fiziksel ürün; Diğer
hu: Termék formátuma: Digitális letöltés; Fizikai termék; Egyéb
nl: Productformaat: Digitale download; Fysiek item; Andere
sl-SI: Format izdelka: Digitalni prenos; Fizični izdelek; Drugo
nb: Produktformat: Digital nedlasting; Fysisk vare; Annet
fr: Format du produit: Téléchargement numérique; Article physique; Autre
sk-SK: Formát produktu: Digitálne stiahnutie; Fyzický predmet; Iné
pl: Format produktu: Pobieranie cyfrowe; Przedmiot fizyczny; Inne
bg-BG: Форма на продукта: Дигитално изтегляне; Физически продукт; Други
zh-TW: 產品形式: 數位下載; 實體商品; 其他
da: Produktformat: Digital download; Fysisk vare; Andet
hr-HR: Format proizvoda: Digitalno preuzimanje; Fizički proizvod; Ostalo
ja: 製品の提供形式: デジタルダウンロード; 物理的アイテム; その他
pt-BR: Formato do produto: Download digital; Item físico; Outro
en: Product format: Digital download; Physical item; Other
fi: Tuotemuoto: Digitaalinen lataus; Fyysinen tuote; Muu
ru: Формат продукта: Цифровая загрузка; Физический товар; Другой
el: Μορφή προϊόντος: Ψηφιακή λήψη; Φυσικό αντικείμενο; Άλλο
de: Produktformat: Digitaler Download; Physischer Artikel; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 产品形式: 数字下载; 实物商品; 其他
ro-RO: Format produs: Descărcare digitală; Produs fizic; Altele
vi: Định dạng sản phẩm: Tải xuống kỹ thuật số; Sản phẩm vật lý; Khác
it: Formato del prodotto: Download digitale; Articolo fisico; Altro
cs: Formát produktu: Digitální stažení; Fyzický předmět; Jiné
pt-PT: Formato do produto: Download digital; Artigo físico; Outro
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์: ดาวน์โหลดดิจิทัล; สินค้าทางกายภาพ; อื่นๆ
sv: Produktformat: Digital nedladdning; Fysisk vara; Övrigt
ko: 제품 형식: 디지털 다운로드; 실물 제품; 기타